Georgia, session 2025_26, HB892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 24A of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
massage therapy practice generally, is amended by revising paragraphs (5) through (12) of
Code Section 43-24A-3, relating to definitions, as follows:
"(5) 'Entity' means the owner or operator of a business where massage therapy for
compensation is performed.
(6)(5) 'License' means a valid and current certificate of registration issued by the board
pursuant to this chapter to practice massage therapy.
(7)(6) 'Licensee' means any person holding a license.
(8)(7) 'Massage therapist' means a person licensed under this chapter as a massage
therapist who administers or teaches massage or massage therapy for compensation.
H. B. 892
- 1 -

LC 60 0149
(9)(8) 'Massage therapy' or 'massage' means the application of a system of structured
touch, pressure, movement, and holding to the soft tissue of the body in which the
primary intent is to enhance or restore health and well-being. Such term includes
complementary methods, including without limitation cupping therapy, taping
techniques, the external application of water, superficial heat, superficial cold, lubricants,
salt scrubs, or other topical preparations and the use of commercially available
electromechanical devices which do not require the use of transcutaneous electrodes and
which mimic or enhance the actions possible by the hands; the term also includes
determining whether massage therapy is appropriate or contraindicated, or whether
referral to another health care provider is appropriate. Such term shall not include the use
of ultrasound, fluidotherapy, laser, and other methods of deep thermal modalities.
(10)(9) 'Massage therapy business' means an entity where the practice of or engagement
in massage therapy is performed by a licensed massage therapist.
(11)(10) 'Person' means a natural person only.
(12)(11) 'Provisionally permitted massage therapist' means a person issued a provisional
permit under this chapter."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by adding a new subsection to Code Section 43-24A-15,
relating to unlawful acts, to read as follows:
"(g) Beginning on August 1, 2025, it shall be a violation of this chapter for any person or
entity to open for business or otherwise operate a massage therapy business between
10:00 P.M. and 6:00 A.M."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 892
- 2 -